Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 5
MISCELLANEOUS

23-60-501. Transfer of funds, property, etc. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 67:

p. 446, § 20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-36.

L. 2015:

Entire section repealed, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 957, § 58, effective August 5.

23-60-502. Applicability of article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit the duties, functions, or responsibilities of the department of human services.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 446, § 21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-37.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1431, § 9, effective June 11.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2692, § 227, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.